Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF505.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2151YH (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 505 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 483A.6C Noodling licenses. 1 1. A person noodling must purchase a noodling license. For 2 purposes of this section, ânoodlingâ means the method of fishing 3 for catfish using oneâs bare hands or feet. 4 2. A noodling license shall allow a person to engage in 5 noodling subject to the following restrictions: 6 a. The noodling must happen during daylight hours. 7 b. The person noodling may not harvest more than three 8 catfish per noodling license. 9 c. Each catfish harvested must be at least ten inches in 10 length. 11 d. Special equipment may not be used. For purposes of this 12 section, âspecial equipmentâ includes scuba equipment, fins, 13 bait, gloves, breathing tubes, and other items determined by 14 the commission. 15 3. The commission shall establish, by rule, the tenure and 16 applicable fee for the permit authorized in this section. 17